Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
In General
§ 19-5-93.
Donations for certain patriotic and charitable uses.

The board of supervisors of each county is authorized, in its discretion, to donate money for the objects and purposes following, to wit:

Confederate graves.For the location, marking, care and maintenance of the grave or graves and graveyard of Confederate soldiers or sailors who died in the Confederate service, and the purchase, if necessary, of the land on which any of the said graveyards may be situated, and the erection and maintenance of appropriate monuments and appropriate inscriptions thereon. In the exercise of this power the board is fully authorized to accept donations of land on which any of said graveyards may be situated and also money or funds to be used for any of the purposes in this section expressed.

Any board of supervisors may, in its discretion, contribute money to be used for the upkeep of graves of the Confederate dead in its county.

Care of the aged.For the support and maintenance of such residents of the county who are worthy, indigent aged inmates of the Old Ladies’ Home of Jackson, Mississippi, or of the Golden Age Nursing Home and Hospital for North Mississippi of Greenwood, Mississippi, and not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per annum for the support of the county’s inmates of the Old Men’s Home, located near Jackson, Mississippi, and in addition thereto a sum not exceeding Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) per annum to each of said institutions for their support and maintenance in the care of the aged.

King’s Daughters.To the King’s Daughters in their respective counties for charities under their supervision.

Travelers Aid Society.A sum of money not exceeding Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) per month for the support of the organization known as the Travelers Aid Society, provided the same is nonsectarian.

Hospitals for pellagra sufferers.For the establishment and maintenance of a hospital for the treatment of persons afflicted with pellagra. For this purpose the board may issue bonds and incur such indebtedness within the limits now authorized by law.

Tubercular hospitals.For the establishment and maintenance of a hospital for the care and treatment of persons suffering from tuberculosis. In the execution of this power the board may select trustees to establish and operate said hospital. In counties having a population of more than forty thousand (40,000) people, as shown by the latest United States census, the board may set aside, appropriate and expend monies from the general fund for the purpose of aiding in the maintenance and support of hospitals maintained and operated in such county for the care and treatment of persons suffering from tuberculosis. The monies shall be expended by the board through such trustees, not less than three (3) and not more than five (5), to be elected by the board of supervisors annually. The trustees shall file reports with the board at least once every six (6) months showing in detail all expenditures made by them and the number of patients which have been for the preceding period aided or cared for by the institution, and the board may otherwise require a strict accounting of the administration of said funds.

Same – additional provisions.The boards of supervisors of one or more counties are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, separately or jointly, to acquire by gift, purchase or lease, real estate, for tubercular hospital purposes, and to own, erect, build, establish, maintain, regulate and support a tubercular hospital and to remodel buildings on such property to be used for such hospital purposes.

In the event the boards of supervisors of two (2) or more counties agree to cooperate in establishing and maintaining such hospital, the board of supervisors of each of said counties shall adopt a resolution agreeing to the proportionate part each county will contribute to the establishment and maintaining of such hospital.

Each county operating under the provisions of this subsection is hereby authorized and empowered to set aside, appropriate and expend monies from the general fund for the purpose of erecting, maintaining and operating such hospital.

Charity wards in hospitals.A sum of money not exceeding One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per month to maintain a charity ward or wards in any hospital in their respective counties, or in the event there shall be no hospital in such county, then a like sum, in their discretion, to maintain a charity ward or wards in any hospital in any adjoining county receiving and treating patients from such county having no hospital.

Same – coast counties.The several counties of this state bordering on the tidewater of the Gulf of Mexico are hereby authorized and empowered, in the discretion of the proper authorities thereof, to appropriate such a sum of money as said authorities shall deem reasonable, to provide and maintain a charity ward or wards, in any of the hospitals in said counties, or, in the discretion of said authorities, to make and enter into contracts with any such hospitals for the treatment and care in such hospitals of the indigent sick of said counties, and to pay therefor out of the general fund of such counties such sum or sums as shall be a reasonable and just compensation to said hospital. However, the board of supervisors of any county mentioned herein may, in its discretion, make and enter into contracts with any hospital in any adjoining county receiving and treating patients from the respective counties mentioned herein in such hospitals of the indigent sick of said counties, mentioned herein, and to pay therefor out of the general fund of such county, such sum or sums that shall be reasonable and just to said hospitals.

Public libraries.A sum not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per annum toward the support and maintenance of one or more public libraries situated in the county. In any county whose total assessed valuation, including railroads and all public utilities, is more than Eighteen Million Dollars ($18,000,000.00) the board, in its discretion, may appropriate a sum not to exceed Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) per annum for public libraries.

The board may also give or donate any legislative journals, constitutional convention journals, printed official reports of any state or county officers, official reports of departments, bureaus or officers of the United States, and copies of the acts of the Legislature or laws of Mississippi now or hereafter in the county library of such county and not needed, in the opinion of the board in the county library (but not including any Mississippi reports and not including any acts of the Legislature or laws of the state, unless such acts or laws be more than twenty (20) years old) to any library or library association or foundation or organization maintaining a free public library for reference or otherwise, provided such library, association, foundation or organization owns free from encumbrance a fireproof library building located in this state, in which building said journals, reports, acts and laws may be and shall be deposited where received under this subsection and made accessible under reasonable regulations to the general public. Such library, association, foundation or organization shall not have the right to sell or otherwise dispose of said journals, reports, acts and laws. Said journals, reports, acts and laws may be returned to the county library from which received without expense to the county, or to the state library, without expense to the state, at any time by the library, association, foundation or organization receiving the same.

Any gift or donation made by the board of supervisors of any county under the authority of this subsection shall be evidenced by an order spread upon the minutes of said board. The county shall bear no expense in connection with any donation. The sheriff of the county, or the custodian of the county library, shall deliver to the representative of the library, association, foundation or organization entitled to receive the same any of said journals, reports, acts, laws and official publications in accordance with the directions contained in any order of the board of supervisors for the delivery of the same, and shall take proper receipt from the party receiving the same, and shall deliver such receipt to the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county, and the board of supervisors shall have the said receipt entered in full on the minutes of the board.

Any library, association, foundation or organization receiving any gift or donation from any county under this subsection shall report in writing to the board of supervisors, from which such gifts or donations have been received every two (2) years, that the gifts and donations so received are still in the possession of the donee and are accessible to the general public. If any of the gifts or donations so received have been lost, destroyed or have otherwise disappeared, report thereof shall be made.

If any library, association, foundation or organization receiving gifts or donations under this subsection shall cease operating as a free public library or shall cease to be the owner of a fireproof building in which it keeps and maintains a free public library, for reference or otherwise, the said library, association, foundation or organization shall thereupon immediately return to the county library, without expense to the county, or to the state library, without expense to the state, any gifts or donations it may have received under this subsection.

Patriotic organizations and memorials.A sum not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) to build or aid any post of the American Legion, any chapter of the Daughters of the American Revolution, any chapter of the United Daughters of the Confederacy, or any post, unit or chapter of any patriotic organization within the county in building a memorial to the veterans of World War I and World War II; and a sum not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) to aid in defraying the cost of the erection of suitable memorials to deceased soldiers, sailors and marines of the late world wars. Such appropriation may be made, even though no provision has been made therefor in the county budget.

American Red Cross.Any board of supervisors of any county in this state is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to donate annually, out of any monies in its respective treasury, to be drawn by warrant thereon, a sum not exceeding One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per million of assessed valuation to the support of a local chapter of the American Red Cross.

St. Jude Hospital.For the payment of mileage expense for transporting persons to St. Jude Hospital in Memphis, Tennessee, for treatment. The mileage shall be based on a round-trip basis from the patient’s place of residence to St. Jude Hospital at the mileage rate set forth in Section 25-3-41.

Public museums.For the support and maintenance of such public museums located in the county constituted under the provisions of Chapter 9, Title 39, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Domestic violence shelters.The board of supervisors of any county in this state is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to donate annually out of any money in the county treasury, such sums as the board deems advisable to support any domestic violence shelter or rape crisis center operating within or serving its area. For the purposes of this section, “rape crisis center” means a place established to provide care, counseling and related services to victims of rape, attempted rape, sexual battery or attempted sexual battery.

Literacy programs.The board of supervisors of any county in this state is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to donate out of the general fund of the county such sum of money as the board deems reasonable to any literacy program being conducted within the county.

Care of neglected children.The board of supervisors of any county in this state, in its discretion, may donate annually out of any money in the county treasury such sums as the board deems advisable to support any residential group home for the abused, abandoned or neglected children which operates within or serves the county. For the purposes of this paragraph the term “residential group home” means a group residence established to provide care and counseling, and to serve as a home, for children who are the victims of abuse, neglect or abandonment.

Boys and Girls Club.To any chartered chapter of the Boys and Girls Clubs of America located within the county, out of any funds in the county treasury, provided that the cumulative sum of donations to all chapters within the county does not exceed the amount generated in the county by one-fourth (1/4) mill on all of the taxable property within the county, during the fiscal year in which the donations are made. Nothing in this paragraph authorizes the imposition of additional tax.

Mississippi Burn Care Fund.To the Mississippi Burn Care Fund, subject to the limitations specified in Section 21-19-58.

Court Appointed Special Advocates.To any chapter of the Court Appointed Special Advocates (CASA), out of any funds in the county treasury, provided that the cumulative sum of donations to a chapter does not exceed the amount generated in the county by one-fourth (1/4) mill on all of the taxable property within the county, during the fiscal year in which the donations are made. Nothing in this paragraph authorizes the imposition of additional tax.

National Voluntary Organizations Active in Disaster (NVOAD).To a local chapter of NVOAD, whether in-kind contributions or out of any funds in the county treasury, provided that the cumulative sum of donations to a local NVOAD does not exceed the amount generated in the county by one-fourth (1/4) mill on all of the taxable property within the county during the fiscal year in which the donations are made. Nothing in this paragraph authorizes the imposition of additional tax.

Farmers’ markets.The board of supervisors of any county in this state, in its discretion, may donate annually out of any money in the county treasury, such sums as the board deems advisable to support any farmers’ market that is certified by the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce and operating within the county, not to exceed the amount that would be generated from the levy of a one-fourth (1/4) mill ad valorem tax upon all taxable property in the county.

Young Men’s Christian Association (YMCA).To any chartered chapter of the YMCA located within the county, out of any funds in the county treasury, provided that the cumulative sum of donations to all chapters within the county does not exceed the amount generated in the county by one-fourth (1/4) mill on all of the taxable property within the county, during the fiscal year in which the donations are made. Nothing in this paragraph authorizes the imposition of additional tax.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 3798, 3810, 3811; Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 3811c; 1930, § 290 (a-l); 1942, § 2998; Laws, 1908, ch. 134; Laws, 1916, chs. 143, 235; Laws, 1918, ch. 205; Laws, 1920, ch. 289; Laws, 1928, chs. 233, 236; Laws, 1930, chs. 33, 56, 185; Laws, 1938, ch. 299; Laws, 1956, ch. 181; Laws, 1958, ch. 212; Laws, 1962, ch. 251; Laws, 1976, ch. 373; Laws, 1983, ch. 331, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 502, § 8; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 8; Laws, 1990, ch. 318, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 539, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 358, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 415, § 2; Laws, 2011, ch. 461, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 467, § 3; Laws, 2013, ch. 396, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 19-5-95.
Aid to fire departments.

The board of supervisors of any county in this state having a population of less than one hundred fifty thousand (150,000), according to the most recent federal census, is hereby empowered and authorized to appropriate out of the county treasury annually a sum not in excess of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) in aid of any fire department for services and protection by such fire department, and, in its discretion, to appropriate out of the county treasury annually a sum not in excess of the amount which would be produced by a levy of one-fourth (1/4) mill on all taxable property within the county in aid of municipal fire departments in the county, or in aid of fire protection districts and volunteer fire departments within the county which meet the requirements set forth in Section 83-1-39(6), but in no event shall the aggregate amount appropriated annually under this section exceed an amount equal to the amount which would be produced by a levy of one-fourth (1/4) mill on all taxable property within the county.

The board of supervisors of any county in this state having a population of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) or greater, according to the most recent federal census, is hereby empowered and authorized to appropriate out of the county treasury annually a sum not in excess of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) in aid of any fire department for services and protection by such fire department, and, in its discretion, to appropriate out of the county treasury annually a sum not in excess of the amount which would be produced by a levy of three-quarters (3/4) mill on all taxable property within the county in aid of municipal fire departments in the county, or in aid of fire protection districts and volunteer fire departments within the county which meet the requirements set forth in Section 83-1-39(6), but in no event shall the aggregate amount appropriated annually under this section exceed an amount equal to the amount which would be produced by a levy of three-quarters (3/4) mill on all taxable property within the county.

Any appropriation that may be provided as prescribed under this section shall be additional and supplemental to any other funds provided or made available for such purposes under this section or any other section of law and shall not be construed to restrict any such other funds that may be provided to municipal fire departments in the county, fire protection districts and volunteer fire departments within the county which meet the requirements of Section 83-1-39(6).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 370; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3743; 1930, § 234; 1942, § 2912; Laws, 1904, ch. 101; Laws, 1930, ch. 24; Laws, 1981, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7; Laws, 2017, ch. 405, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 5, 2017).

§ 19-5-97.
Purchase, operation and maintenance of fire trucks and other fire fighting equipment.

The board of supervisors of any county who find that the public interest of the county, or any supervisors’ district or districts within the county, will be conserved thereby, may purchase, operate, and maintain fire trucks, pumps, tanks, trailers, fire hose, fire extinguishers, and other fire fighting equipment, and may contract with one or more towns or municipalities in the county for keeping and storing same, or any part of same, and assisting in the use and operation thereof. Such board may pay its part of the cost of such purchasing, operation and maintenance from the general fund of the county if the entire county participates in the provisions of this section, or from a special fund to be known as the “Fire Prevention Fund” if less than all five districts participate. The board is empowered to authorize the participation of either the entire county or any district or districts whose public interests will be conserved thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2912.3; Laws, 1968, ch. 283, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 21, 1968).

§ 19-5-99.
Establishment of economic development districts.

Subject to the provisions of Section 19-9-111, the board of supervisors of any county in the State of Mississippi, in its discretion, by order duly entered on its minutes, may establish economic development districts comprising all of the county, or one or more supervisors districts of the county, or may establish such economic development districts in cooperation with one or more other counties or with municipalities or with other local and private economic development groups. The board of supervisors may do everything within its power to secure and further industrial development of the county or counties or district, to advertise the natural resources and possibilities of the same, and to maintain and support the same.

All monies collected for the support and maintenance of such economic development district, in accordance with the tax levy provided in Section 19-9-111, shall be placed in the county treasury to the credit of the county or district economic development fund and shall be expended as other public funds are expended, and in which event the employees of such economic development district shall be employees of the county and considered as such. In addition to such funds provided by taxation, the board of supervisors of such county may accept gifts, gratuities and donations from municipalities in such districts and from any persons, firms or corporations desiring to make such donations. Such appropriation, gift or donation shall also be placed in the county treasury and be expended in the support and maintenance of such district.

At the option of such board of supervisors, or boards of supervisors if more than one (1) county is embraced in such economic development district, it may provide for the management of such economic development district by appointing not more than twenty-five (25) nor less than five (5) trustees, or if a multicounty district not more than five (5) trustees per participating county, who shall be qualified electors residing within such economic development district, to manage the affairs of such district, and in which event the funds made available by the county or counties for the support and maintenance of such economic development district may be expended by a majority vote of such trustees so appointed to manage such economic development district. Each trustee who is an officer of the economic development district shall qualify by giving bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in a penalty equal to Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), the premiums on all such surety bonds being paid by such economic development district. If this option is exercised and such districts operated and maintained under this paragraph, then in such event the employees of such economic development district shall not be considered as employees of the county for state retirement or any other purposes.

All funds secured and expended under the provisions of this section shall be public funds and the Auditor of Public Accounts of the State of Mississippi shall audit the same as other public funds are now audited.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the board of supervisors of a county having therein an economic development district established under this section or any other law and the governing authorities of any municipality located within the economic development district in such county may enter into a contract providing for the contribution of funds by the municipality or other local and private economic development groups to the economic development district and providing for the appointment by the municipal governing authorities or other local and private economic development groups of a number of trustees, as determined by the parties to the contract, to assist in the management of the district. In like manner, any economic or industrial development foundation or private economic development group may enter into a contract with the board of supervisors of the county or jointly with the board of supervisors of the county and municipal governing authorities providing for the contribution of funds by the economic or industrial development foundation or private economic development group to the economic development district and providing for the appointment by the officials or governing board of the foundation of a number of trustees, as determined by the parties to the contract, to assist in the management of the district.

Any economic development district established under this section may, when suitable office space is not otherwise available, purchase and acquire title to real estate within the district and make any improvements thereon to provide the office space it considers necessary for efficient operation of such district. Provided, however, that no contract or agreement for the exclusive listing, sale or representation for sale of publicly owned property shall be entered into by such economic development districts with any real estate broker or brokers.

Any economic development district established under this section shall have the authority to acquire by gift, purchase or otherwise, and to own, hold, maintain, control and develop real estate situated within the county or counties comprising such district for the development, use and operation of industrial parks or other industrial development purposes. The district is further authorized and empowered to engage in works of internal improvement therefor including, but not limited to, construction or contracting for the construction of streets, roads, railroads, spur tracks, site improvements, water, sewerage, drainage, pollution control and other related facilities necessary or required for industrial development purposes or the development of industrial park complexes; to acquire, purchase, install, lease, construct, own, hold, equip, control, maintain, use, operate and repair other structures and facilities necessary and convenient for the planning, development, use, operation and maintenance of an industrial park or parks or for other industrial development purposes, including, but not limited to, utility installations, elevators, compressors, warehouses, buildings and air, rail and other transportation terminals and pollution control facilities.

Contracts for the construction, improvement, equipping or furnishing of an industrial site and improvements thereon as authorized in this section shall be entered into upon the basis of public bidding under Section 31-7-1 et seq.

For the development of such projects, the board of supervisors of any county that establishes an economic development district under this section or that establishes an economic development district in cooperation with one or more other counties, or municipalities or other local and private economic groups, may, upon receipt of a resolution duly adopted by the trustees of such district, issue, secure and manage its bonds in the manner prescribed by Sections 19-9-5, 19-9-7, 19-9-9, 19-9-11, 19-9-13, 19-9-15, 19-9-17, 19-9-19, 19-9-21, 19-9-23, 19-9-25 and 19-9-29. Such bonds shall be sold in accordance with the provisions of Section 31-19-25. The full faith, credit and resources of the county shall be irrevocably pledged for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds issued under this section. Any income derived from the sale or lease of the property authorized to be acquired under this section shall be applied in one or more of the following manners: (a) the retirement of bonds authorized to be issued under this section; (b) further improvement or development of such industrial parks or other related industrial development activities; or (c) payment into the general fund of the county to be used for any lawful purpose. Any amounts so paid into the general fund shall be included in the computation of total receipts and subject to the restrictions of Section 27-39-321. The board of supervisors may covenant with or for the benefit of the registered owners of any bonds issued under this section with respect to the application of any or all of such income and shall, by resolution adopted before or promptly after receipt of any such income, determine, in its discretion subject only to the restrictions set forth above and any covenants made to or for the benefit of any registered owners of bonds issued under this section, the manner in which such income shall be applied.

The bonds authorized by this section and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi; however, any lessee or purchaser shall not be exempt from ad valorem taxes on industrial sites and improvements thereon unless otherwise provided by the general laws of this state, and purchases required to establish the project and financed by bond proceeds shall not be exempt from taxation in the State of Mississippi.

Economic development districts established under this section are authorized and empowered:

To sell, lease, trade, exchange or otherwise dispose of industrial sites or rail lines situated within industrial parks to individuals, firms or corporations, public or private, for industrial and warehouse use, as well as the Mississippi Military Department or Mississippi National Guard for military use, upon such terms and conditions, and for such considerations, with such safeguards as will best promote and protect the public interest, convenience and necessity, and to execute deeds, leases, contracts, easements and other legal instruments necessary or convenient therefor. Any industrial lease may be executed by the district upon such terms and conditions and for such monetary rental or other considerations as may be found to be in the best interest of the public, upon an order or resolution being spread upon the minutes of the district authorizing same.

To sue and be sued in their own name.

To fix and prescribe fees, charges and rates for the use of any water, sewerage, pollution control or other facilities constructed and operated in connection with an industrial park or parks and to collect same from persons, firms and corporations using the same for industrial, warehouse and related purposes and are further empowered to deny or terminate such services for nonpayment of said fees, charges or rates by the users of said services.

To employ engineers, attorneys, accountants, consultants, licensed real estate brokers and appraisers, and such executive and administrative personnel as shall be reasonably necessary to carry out the duties and authority authorized by this section with funds available for such purposes. Such districts may also contribute money directly to the development and cost of operation of any industrial development foundation or other private economic development group in the county.

Any county board of supervisors authorized to issue bonds under this section is hereby authorized, either separately or jointly with the governing authority of any municipality within the county, to acquire, enlarge, expand, renovate or improve an existing building or buildings located in the county or municipality and to issue bonds for such purpose in the manner provided by this section.

Economic development districts established under the provisions of a local and private act enacted before July 1, 1997, are authorized and empowered to employ engineers, attorneys, accountants, consultants, licensed real estate brokers and appraisers, and such executive and administrative personnel as shall be reasonably necessary to carry out the duties and authority authorized by this section, or by such local and private act, with funds available for such purposes.

The enumeration of any specific rights and powers contained in this section where followed by general powers shall not be construed in a restrictive sense, but rather in as broad and comprehensive a sense as possible to effectuate the purposes of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2911.3; Laws, 1960, ch. 187.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 254, §§ 1-5; 976, ch. 439; Laws, 1978, ch. 451, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 539; Laws, 1984, ch. 495, § 13; Laws, 1985, ch. 441, § 1; reenacted and amended, 1985, ch. 474, § 22; Laws, 1986, ch. 304; Laws, 1986, ch. 438, § 7; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 17; Laws, 1987, ch. 483, § 12; Laws, 1988, ch. 442, § 9; Laws, 1988, ch. 458; Laws, 1989, ch. 537; Laws, 1990, ch. 518, § 9; Laws, 1991, ch. 618, § 9; Laws, 1992, ch. 491 § 10; Laws, 1993, ch. 425, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 423, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 492, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997; Laws, 2019, ch. 333, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019; brought forward without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 363, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 19-5-101.
Establishment of juvenile residential treatment centers.

The board of supervisors of each county shall have the power to expend monies from the county general fund to match any other funds for the purpose of establishing juvenile residential treatment centers including, but not limited to, treatment centers and half-way houses.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7185-31; Laws, 1972, ch. 514, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1972).

§ 19-5-103.
Regulation of massage parlors and public displays of nudity.

In accordance with the provisions of Section 19-3-4l, providing that additional powers may be conferred upon the boards of supervisors, the board of supervisors of any county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico and having two (2) judicial districts and the board of supervisors of any county adjacent to any county of this or any adjoining state wherein is located a city having a population in excess of two hundred thousand (200,000), according to the latest federal census, are hereby empowered to promulgate, adopt and enforce ordinances which are necessary and reasonable for the protection of public health and the maintenance of order in relation to the advertisement, the offering of services and the dispensation for compensation of personal services in establishments known as massage parlors and to promulgate, adopt and enforce ordinances which are necessary and reasonable for the protection of public health and the maintenance of order in relation to public displays of nudity.

For the purposes of this section, the term “massage parlor” shall mean any premises where a person manipulates, rubs, caresses, touches, massages, kneads, palpates or otherwise physically contacts the body or part or area of the body of another person. The term “massage parlor” shall not include gymnasia or other premises wherein persons engage in bona fide athletic or conditioning activities, duly licensed barbershop, beauty parlor, chiropractic clinic or other premises of a person practicing a vocation or profession regulated and licensed by the state.

For the purposes of this section, the term “nudity” means uncovered, or less than opaquely covered, postpubertal human genitals, pubic areas, the postpubertal human female breast below a point immediately above the top of the areola, or the covered human male genitals in a discernibly turgid state. For purposes of this definition, a female breast is considered uncovered if the nipple only or the nipple and areola only are uncovered, however, the term “nudity” does not include a woman’s breast-feeding of her child whether or not the breast or any part of it is exposed as any element of breast-feeding.

For the purposes of this section, the term “public display” means the exposing, exhibiting, revealing, or in any fashion displaying the nude human body or any representation thereof in any location in such a manner that it may be readily seen by the public by normal unaided vision and the term also means any play, motion picture, dance, show or other presentation, whether pictured, animated or live, performed before an audience and which in whole or in part depicts or reveals nudity or sexual conduct.

Ordinances adopted pursuant to this section shall comport with the elements of due process and shall include but not be limited to specificity, adequate notice, right to hearing, right to counsel, right to appeal adverse findings to a judicial authority and penalties rationally related to prohibited acts.

Boards of supervisors proposing such ordinances shall publish and post notice of such intentions not less than twenty (20) days prior to the holding of a public hearing whereat the purposes and substance of such ordinances shall be fully discussed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 460; Laws, 1981, ch. 331, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 520, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 3, 2006.).

§ 19-5-104.
Regulation of establishments where public displays of nudity are present.

In accordance with the provisions of Section 19-3-41, providing that additional powers may be conferred upon the board of supervisors of any county, the board of supervisors of any county are hereby empowered to promulgate, adopt and enforce ordinances which are necessary and reasonable for the regulation of establishments where public displays of nudity are present.

For the purposes of this section the terms “nudity” and “public display” shall have the same meanings as those terms are defined in Section 19-5-103.

Ordinances adopted pursuant to this section shall comport with the elements of due process and shall include, but not be limited to, specificity, adequate notice, right to hearing, right to counsel, right to appeal adverse findings to a judicial authority and penalties rationally related to prohibited acts.

Boards of supervisors proposing such ordinances shall publish and post notice of such intentions not less than twenty (20) days prior to the holding of a public hearing whereat the purposes and substance of such ordinances shall be fully discussed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 355, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.